Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-937
University of Nebraska; degree programs; sole responsibility.

The University of Nebraska shall have sole responsibility for doctoral degree programs, first professional degree programs, cooperative agricultural extension programs, and other degree programs and services specifically provided for by law. The first professional degrees, as defined by the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System, offered by the University of Nebraska shall be medicine, law, dentistry, and pharmacy. In addition, the University of Nebraska may, with approval by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education, offer a first professional degree in architecture.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 21;

Laws 1988, LB 927, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 8.

Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System, see sections 85-1412 and 85-1424.